Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $450,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to YMCA of the North to provide career exploration, job training, a workforce development partnership with Beacons community college, and workforce development services for underserved youth and young adults. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end